Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MARSHALL; MERIT CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,143,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the city of Marshall to design, construct, furnish, and equip improvements at the Minnesota Emergency Response and Industrial Training Center outlined in Phase 3 of the Master Development Plan, including: a 50-yard and 300-yard firearms range; firearms support buildings; and a live burn buildout structure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,143,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end